Illinois, session 104th, SB1239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.40 and 34-18.34 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.40)7    Sec. 10-20.40. Student biometric information.8    (a) For the purposes of this Section: , 9    "Biometric "biometric information" means any information 10that is collected through an identification process for 11individuals based on their unique behavioral or physiological 12characteristics, including fingerprint, hand geometry, voice, 13or facial recognition or iris or retinal scans.14    "Biometric system" means any combination of hardware, 15software, firmware, or tools used to obtain, collect, process, 16store, transmit, display, or otherwise handle biometric 17information, including, but not limited to, facial or voice 18recognition software and software to conduct fingerprint, hand 19geometry, or iris or retinal scans. 20    "Facial recognition" means any tool using an automated or 21semiautomated process that assists in uniquely identifying or 22verifying a person by comparing or analyzing patterns based on 23the person's face.   SB1239- 2 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1    (b) A school district is prohibited from purchasing or 2otherwise acquiring biometric systems, including facial 3recognition software, to use on students. School districts 4that collect biometric information from students shall adopt 5policies that require, at a minimum, all of the following:6        (1) Written permission from the individual who has 7    legal custody of the student, as defined in Section 8    10-20.12b of this Code, or from the student if he or she 9    has reached the age of 18.10        (2) The discontinuation of use of a student's 11    biometric information under either of the following 12    conditions:13            (A) upon the student's graduation or withdrawal 14        from the school district; or15            (B) upon receipt in writing of a request for 16        discontinuation by the individual having legal custody 17        of the student or by the student if he or she has 18        reached the age of 18.19        (3) The destruction of all of a student's biometric 20    information within 30 days after the use of the biometric 21    information is discontinued in accordance with item (2) of 22    this subsection (b).23        (4) The use of biometric information solely for 24    identification or fraud prevention.25        (5) A prohibition on the sale, lease, or other 26    disclosure of biometric information to another person or   SB1239- 3 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1    entity, unless:2            (A) the individual who has legal custody of the 3        student or the student, if he or she has reached the 4        age of 18, consents to the disclosure; or5            (B) the disclosure is required by court order.6        (6) The storage, transmittal, and protection of all 7    biometric information from disclosure.8    (b-5) A school district may not do any of the following 9with respect to students: 10        (1) Obtain, retain, possess, access, request, or use 11    biometric systems or biometric information derived from 12    biometric systems.13        (2) Enter into an agreement with a third party for the 14    purpose of obtaining, retaining, possessing, accessing, or 15    using, by or on behalf of the school district, biometric 16    systems, including facial recognition software or 17    biometric information derived from biometric systems. 18    (b-10) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, if a school 20district is in possession of student biometric information, 21then the school district shall destroy the biometric 22information and provide certified documentation of destruction 23to the State Board of Education. 24    (b-15) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, any school 26district that has contracted with a third party to obtain,   SB1239- 4 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1collect, or store student biometric information shall require 2the third party to destroy the biometric information in its 3possession and confirm in writing the completion of this 4destruction to the school district. 5    (b-20) During the 30-day period in which a school district 6may still have student biometric information in its possession 7under subsection (b-10), the school district is prohibited 8from selling, leasing, or otherwise disclosing the biometric 9information to another person or entity unless:10        (1) the individual who has legal custody of the 11    student or the student, if he or she has reached the age of 12    18, consents to the disclosure; or13        (2) the disclosure is required by court order. 14    (c) (Blank). Failure to provide written consent under item 15(1) of subsection (b) of this Section by the individual who has 16legal custody of the student or by the student, if he or she 17has reached the age of 18, must not be the basis for refusal of 18any services otherwise available to the student.19    (d) Student biometric information may be destroyed without 20notification to or the approval of a local records commission 21under the Local Records Act if destroyed within 30 days after 22the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly use of the biometric information is discontinued in 24accordance with item (2) of subsection (b) of this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 95-232, eff. 8-16-07; 95-793, eff. 1-1-09; 2695-876, eff. 8-21-08; 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.)   SB1239- 5 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.34)2    Sec. 34-18.34. Student biometric information. 3    (a) For the purposes of this Section: , 4    "Biometric" "biometric information" means any information 5that is collected through an identification process for 6individuals based on their unique behavioral or physiological 7characteristics, including fingerprint, hand geometry, voice, 8or facial recognition or iris or retinal scans.9    "Biometric system" means any combination of hardware, 10software, firmware, or tools used to obtain, collect, process, 11store, transmit, display, or otherwise handle biometric 12information, including, but not limited to, facial or voice 13recognition software and software to conduct fingerprint, hand 14geometry, or iris or retinal scans. 15    "Facial recognition" means any tool using an automated or 16semiautomated process that assists in uniquely identifying or 17verifying a person by comparing or analyzing patterns based on 18the person's face. 19    (b) The school district is prohibited from purchasing or 20otherwise acquiring biometric systems, including facial 21recognition software, to use on students. If the school 22district collects biometric information from students, the 23district shall adopt a policy that requires, at a minimum, all 24of the following:25        (1) Written permission from the individual who has   SB1239- 6 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1    legal custody of the student, as defined in Section 2    10-20.12b of this Code, or from the student if he or she 3    has reached the age of 18.4        (2) The discontinuation of use of a student's 5    biometric information under either of the following 6    conditions:7            (A) upon the student's graduation or withdrawal 8        from the school district; or9            (B) upon receipt in writing of a request for 10        discontinuation by the individual having legal custody 11        of the student or by the student if he or she has 12        reached the age of 18.13        (3) The destruction of all of a student's biometric 14    information within 30 days after the use of the biometric 15    information is discontinued in accordance with item (2) of 16    this subsection (b).17        (4) The use of biometric information solely for 18    identification or fraud prevention.19        (5) A prohibition on the sale, lease, or other 20    disclosure of biometric information to another person or 21    entity, unless:22            (A) the individual who has legal custody of the 23        student or the student, if he or she has reached the 24        age of 18, consents to the disclosure; or25            (B) the disclosure is required by court order.26        (6) The storage, transmittal, and protection of all   SB1239- 7 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1    biometric information from disclosure.2    (b-5) The school district may not do any of the following 3with respect to students: 4        (1) Obtain, retain, possess, access, request, or use 5    biometric systems or biometric information derived from 6    biometric systems.7        (2) Enter into an agreement with a third party for the 8    purpose of obtaining, retaining, possessing, accessing, or 9    using, by or on behalf of the school district, biometric 10    systems, including facial recognition software or 11    biometric information derived from biometric systems. 12    (b-10) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, if the school 14district is in possession of student biometric information, 15then the school district shall destroy the biometric 16information and provide certified documentation of destruction 17to the State Board of Education. 18    (b-15) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, if the school 20district has contracted with a third party to obtain, collect, 21or store student biometric information, then the school 22district shall require the third party to destroy the 23biometric information in its possession and confirm in writing 24the completion of this destruction to the school district. 25    (b-20) During the 30-day period in which the school 26district may still have student biometric information in its   SB1239- 8 -LRB104 08095 LNS 18141 b1possession under subsection (b-10), the school district is 2prohibited from selling, leasing, or otherwise disclosing the 3biometric information to another person or entity unless: 4        (1) the individual who has legal custody of the 5    student or the student, if he or she has reached the age of 6    18, consents to the disclosure; or7        (2) the disclosure is required by court order. 8    (c) (Blank). Failure to provide written consent under item 9(1) of subsection (b) of this Section by the individual who has 10legal custody of the student or by the student, if he or she 11has reached the age of 18, must not be the basis for refusal of 12any services otherwise available to the student.13    (d) Student biometric information may be destroyed without 14notification to or the approval of a local records commission 15under the Local Records Act if destroyed within 30 days after 16the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly use of the biometric information is discontinued in 18accordance with item (2) of subsection (b) of this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 95-232, eff. 8-16-07; 95-793, eff. 1-1-09; 2095-876, eff. 8-21-08.)